ja: バスクラリネット本体の素材: アクリロニトリルブタジエンスチレン (ABS); アフリカンブラックウッド (グラナディラ); コンポジット; 金属; その他の木材; 合成樹脂; その他
es: Material del cuerpo del clarinete bajo: Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Madera negra africana (granadillo); Compuesto; Metal; Otra madera; Resina sintética; Otro
pl: Materiał korpusu klarnetu basowego: Akrylonitryl-butadien-styren (ABS); Afrykańskie drewno czarne (grenadilla); Kompozyt; Metal; Inne drewno; Żywica syntetyczna; Inny
pt-PT: Material do corpo do clarinete baixo: Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Ébano africano (granadilha); Composto; Metal; Outra madeira; Resina sintética; Outro
sl-SI: Material ohišja bas klarineta: Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Afriški črni les (grenadil); Kompozit; Kovina; Drug les; Sintetična smola; Drugo
sv: Basklarinettens material: Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Afrikanskt svartträ (grenadilla); Komposit; Metall; Annat trä; Syntetharts; Övrigt
ko: 베이스 클라리넷 바디 재질: 아크릴로니트릴 부타디엔 스티렌(ABS); 아프리칸 블랙우드(그레나딜라); 복합재; 금속; 기타 목재; 합성 수지; 기타
en: Bass clarinet body material: Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); African blackwood (grenadilla); Composite; Metal; Other wood; Synthetic resin; Other
nb: Bassklarinett kroppsmateriale: Akrylnitril-butadien-styren (ABS); Afrikansk grenadilltre (grenadilla); Kompositt; Metall; Annet treverk; Syntetisk harpiks; Annet
zh-CN: 低音单簧管管体材质: 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 非洲黑木（黑黄檀木）; 复合材料; 金属; 其他木材; 合成树脂; 其他
ro-RO: Materialul corpului clarinetului bas: Acrilonitril-butadien-stiren (ABS); Lemn negru african (grenadilla); Compozit; Metal; Alt lemn; Rășină sintetică; Altele
th: วัสดุตัวเครื่องคลาริเน็ตเบส: ABS; แอฟริกันแบล็กวูด (Grenadilla); คอมโพสิต; โลหะ; ไม้อื่นๆ; เรซินสังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
el: Υλικό σώματος μπάσου κλαρινέτου: Ακρυλονιτρίλιο βουταδιένιο στυρένιο (ABS); Αφρικανικό μαύρο ξύλο (γκρεναντίλα); Σύνθετο υλικό; Μέταλλο; Άλλο ξύλο; Συνθετική ρητίνη; Άλλο
vi: Chất liệu thân kèn clarinet bass: Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Gỗ đen châu Phi (grenadilla); Composite; Kim loại; Gỗ khác; Nhựa tổng hợp; Khác
fr: Matériau du corps de la clarinette basse: Acrylonitrile butadiène styrène (ABS); Grenadille d’Afrique; Composite; Métal; Autre bois; Résine synthétique; Autre
sk-SK: Materiál tela basklarinetu: Akrylonitrilbutadiénstyrén (ABS); Africké čierne drevo (grenadil); Kompozit; Kov; Iné drevo; Syntetická živica; Iné
hu: Basszusklarinét-test anyaga: Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Afrikai feketefa (grenadilfa); Kompozit; Fém; Egyéb fa; Műgyanta; Egyéb
zh-TW: 低音單簧管管身材質: 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 非洲黑木 (Grenadilla); 複合材料; 金屬; 其他木材; 合成樹脂; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal tijela bas-klarineta: Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Afričko crno drvo (grenadil); Kompozit; Metal; Ostalo drvo; Sintetička smola; Ostalo
da: Materiale til basklarinettens krop: Acrylonitril-butadien-styren (ABS); Afrikansk sorttræ (grenadil); Komposit; Metal; Andet træ; Syntetisk harpiks; Andet
lt-LT: Bosinio klarneto korpuso medžiaga: Akrilonitrilo butadieno stirenas (ABS); Juodmedis (grenadila); Kompozitas; Metalas; Kita mediena; Sintetinė derva; Kita
de: Material des Bassklarinettenkorpus: Acrylnitril-Butadien-Styrol (ABS); Afrikanisches Grenadillholz; Verbundstoff; Metall; Anderes Holz; Kunstharz; Sonstige
fi: Bassoklarinetin rungon materiaali: Akryylinitriilibutadieenistyreeni (ABS); Afrikan mustapuu (grenadilla); Komposiitti; Metalli; Muu puu; Synteettinen hartsi; Muu
pt-BR: Material do corpo do clarinete baixo: Acrilonitrila butadieno estireno (ABS); Granadilho (African blackwood); Composto; Metal; Outra madeira; Resina sintética; Outros
nl: Basklarinet body materiaal: Acrylonitril-butadieen-styreen (ABS); Afrikaans grenadille; Composiet; Metaal; Ander hout; Kunsthars; Overig
it: Materiale per il corpo del clarinetto basso: Acrilonitrile butadiene stirene (ABS); Legno nero africano (grenadilla); Composito; Metallo; Altro legno; Resina sintetica; Altro
cs: Materiál korpusu basklarinetu: Akrylonitril butadien styren (ABS); Africké černé dřevo (grenadilla); Kompozit; Kov; Jiné dřevo; Syntetická pryskyřice; Jiné
ru: Материал корпуса бас-кларнета: Акрилонитрилбутадиенстирол (АБС-пластик); Африканское черное дерево (гренадил); Композит; Металл; Другое дерево; Синтетическая смола; Другое
bg-BG: Материал на корпуса на бас кларинет: Акрилонитрил бутадиен стирен (ABS); Африканско черно дърво (гренадила); Композитен; Метал; Друго дърво; Синтетична смола; Друго
tr: Bas klarnet gövde malzemesi: Akrilonitril bütadien stiren (ABS); Afrika karadul ağacı (grenadilla); Kompozit; Metal; Diğer ahşap; Sentetik reçine; Diğer